Illinois, session 104th, HB5581.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 5Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 is amended by 6changing Sections 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-7, 2-10, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 73-6, 3-9, 3A-2, 3A-3, 3A-5, 3C-2, 3C-3, 3C-7, 3E-2, and 3E-3 as 8follows: 9    (225 ILCS 410/2-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-2)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)11    Sec. 2-2. Licensure as a barber; qualifications. A person 12is qualified to receive a license as a barber if that person 13has applied in writing or electronically on forms provided by 14the Department, has paid the required fees, and:15        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and16        b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school 17    providing secondary education, or the recognized 18    equivalent of such a certificate, or persons who are 19    beyond the age of compulsory school attendance; and20        c. Has graduated from a licensed school of barbering 21    or school of cosmetology, having completed a total of 22    1,200 1500 hours in the study of barbering extending over 23    a period of not less than 9 months. A licensed school of   HB5581- 2 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    barbering may, at its discretion, consistent with the 2    rules of the Department, accept up to 800 1,000 hours of 3    cosmetology school training at a licensed cosmetology 4    school toward the 1,200 1500 hour course requirement of 5    barbering. Time spent in such study under the laws of 6    another state or territory of the United States or of a 7    foreign country or province shall be credited toward the 8    period of study required by the provisions of this 9    paragraph; and10        d. Has passed an examination caused to be conducted by 11    the Department or its designated testing service to 12    determine fitness to receive a license as a barber; and13        e. Has met all other requirements of this Act or by 14    rule.15(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 16    (225 ILCS 410/2-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-3)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)18    Sec. 2-3. Licensure as a barber by a cosmetology school 19graduate. A person is qualified to receive a license as a 20barber if that person has applied in writing or electronically 21on forms provided by the Department, paid the required fees, 22and:23        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and24        b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school 25    providing secondary education, or the recognized   HB5581- 3 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    equivalent of such a certificate, or persons who are 2    beyond the age of compulsory school attendance; and3        c. Has graduated from a cosmetology school approved by 4    the Department having completed a minimum of 1,200 1500 5    hours in the study of cosmetology; and6        d. Has graduated from a licensed school of barbering 7    or cosmetology having completed a minimum of 400 500 8    additional hours in the study of barbering extending over 9    a period of no less than 3 months. Time spent in such study 10    under the laws of another state or territory of the United 11    States or of a foreign country or province shall be 12    credited toward the period of study required by the 13    provisions of this paragraph; and14        e. Has passed an examination caused to be conducted by 15    the Department, or its designated testing service, to 16    determine fitness to receive a license as a barber; and17        f. Has met any other requirements set forth in this 18    Act or by rule.19(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 20    (225 ILCS 410/2-4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-4)21    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)22    Sec. 2-4. Licensure as a barber teacher; qualifications. A 23person is qualified to receive a license as a barber teacher if 24that person files an application electronically on forms 25provided by the Department, pays the required fee, and:  HB5581- 4 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1        a. Is at least 18 years of age;2        b. Has graduated from high school or its equivalent;3        c. Has a current license as a barber or cosmetologist;4        d. Has graduated from a licensed barber school or 5    school of cosmetology having:6            (1) completed a total of 400 500 hours in barber 7        teacher training extending over a period of not less 8        than 3 months nor more than 2 years and has had 3 years 9        of practical experience as a licensed barber;10            (2) completed a total of 800 1,000 hours of barber 11        teacher training extending over a period of not less 12        than 6 months nor more than 2 years; or13            (3) completed the cosmetology teacher training as 14        specified in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of 15        Section 3-4 of this Act and completed a supplemental 16        barbering course as established by rule; 17        e. Has passed an examination authorized by the 18    Department to determine fitness to receive a license as a 19    barber teacher or a cosmetology teacher; and20        f. Has met any other requirements set forth in this 21    Act or by rule.22    An applicant who is issued a license as a barber teacher is 23not required to maintain a barber license in order to practice 24barbering as defined in this Act.25(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.)   HB5581- 5 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    (225 ILCS 410/2-7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1702-7)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)3    Sec. 2-7. Examination of applicants. The Department shall 4hold examinations of applicants for licensure as barbers and 5barber teachers at such times and places as it may determine. 6Upon request, the examinations shall be administered in 7Spanish and any other language as determined by the Department 8to be necessary pursuant to the Language Equity and Access 9Act.10    Each applicant shall be given an examination testing both 11theoretical and practical knowledge of the following subjects 12insofar as they are related and applicable to the practice of 13barber science and art: (1) anatomy, (2) physiology, (3) skin 14diseases, (4) hygiene and sanitation, (5) barber history, (6) 15this Act and the rules for the administration of this Act, (7) 16hair cutting and styling, (8) shaving, shampooing, and 17permanent waving, (9) massaging, (10) bleaching, tinting, and 18coloring, and (11) implements.19    The examination of applicants for licensure as a barber 20teacher shall include: (a) practice of barbering and styling, 21(b) theory of barbering, (c) methods of teaching, and (d) 22school management.23    An applicant for licensure as a barber who has completed 24960 1,200 hours in the study of barbering may take the 25examination. If an applicant for licensure as a barber fails 26to pass 3 examinations conducted by the Department, the   HB5581- 6 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 2furnish evidence of not less than 100 hours of additional 3study of barbering in a licensed school of barbering or 4cosmetology since the applicant last took the examination. If 5an applicant for licensure as a barber teacher fails to pass 3 6examinations conducted by the Department, the applicant shall, 7before taking a subsequent examination, furnish evidence of 8not less than 64 80 hours of additional study in teaching 9methodology and educational psychology in a licensed school of 10barbering or cosmetology since the applicant last took the 11examination. The requirements for remedial training set forth 12in this Section may be waived in whole or in part by the 13Department upon proof to the Department that the applicant has 14demonstrated competence to again sit for the examination or if 15the Department otherwise determines a waiver is appropriate. 16The Department shall adopt rules establishing standards by 17which this determination shall be made. 18(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 19    (225 ILCS 410/2-10)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)21    Sec. 2-10. Licensed cosmetologist seeking license as a 22barber. A licensed cosmetologist who submits to the Department 23an application for licensure as a barber must meet all 24requirements of this Act for licensure as a barber, except 25that such applicant shall be given credit for hours of   HB5581- 7 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1instruction completed for the applicant's cosmetologist 2license in subjects that are common to both barbering and 3cosmetology and shall complete an additional 400 500 hours of 4instruction in subjects not within the scope of practice of a 5cosmetologist. The Department shall provide for the 6implementation of this provision by rule.7(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 8    (225 ILCS 410/3-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-2)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)10    Sec. 3-2. Licensure; qualifications. 11    (1) A person is qualified to receive a license as a 12cosmetologist who has filed an application in writing or 13electronically on forms provided by the Department, pays the 14required fees, and:15        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and16        b. Is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance 17    or has received a certificate of graduation from a school 18    providing secondary education, or the recognized 19    equivalent of that certificate; and20        c. Has graduated from a licensed school of 21    cosmetology, having completed a program of 1,200 1,500 22    hours in the study of cosmetology extending over a period 23    of not less than 8 months. A licensed school of 24    cosmetology may, at its discretion, consistent with the 25    rules of the Department, accept up to 800 1,000 hours of   HB5581- 8 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    barber school training at a licensed barber school toward 2    the 1,200 1,500 hour program requirement of cosmetology. 3    Time spent in such study under the laws of another state or 4    territory of the United States or of a foreign country or 5    province shall be credited toward the period of study 6    required by the provisions of this paragraph; and7        d. Has passed an examination authorized by the 8    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 9    as a cosmetologist; and10        e. Has met any other requirements set forth in this 11    Act or by rule.12    (2) (Blank).13(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 14    (225 ILCS 410/3-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-3)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)16    Sec. 3-3. Licensure as a cosmetologist by a barber school 17graduate. A person is qualified to receive a license as a 18cosmetologist if that person has filed an application in 19writing or electronically on forms provided by the Department, 20has paid the required fees, and:21        a. Is at least 16 years of age; and22        b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school 23    providing secondary education, or the recognized 24    equivalent of such a certificate, or is beyond the age of 25    compulsory school attendance; and  HB5581- 9 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1        c. Has graduated from a licensed school of barbering 2    having completed 1,200 1500 hours in the study of 3    barbering, and a minimum of 400 500 additional hours in 4    the study of cosmetology extending over a period of no 5    less than 3 months. Time spent in such study under the laws 6    of another state or territory of the United States or of a 7    foreign country or province shall be credited toward the 8    period of study required by the provisions of this 9    paragraph; and10        d. Has passed an examination authorized by the 11    Department to determine fitness to receive a license as a 12    cosmetologist; and13        e. Has met any other requirements of this Act and 14    rules.15(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 16    (225 ILCS 410/3-4)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-4)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)18    Sec. 3-4. Licensure as cosmetology teacher or cosmetology 19clinic teacher; qualifications.20    (a) A person is qualified to receive license as a 21cosmetology teacher if that person has applied in writing or 22electronically on forms provided by the Department, has paid 23the required fees, and:24        (1) is at least 18 years of age;25        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent;  HB5581- 10 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1        (3) has a current license as a cosmetologist;2        (4) has either: (i) completed a program of 400 500 3    hours of teacher training in a licensed school of 4    cosmetology and had 2 years of practical experience as a 5    licensed cosmetologist within 5 years preceding the 6    examination; (ii) completed a program of 800 1,000 hours 7    of teacher training in a licensed school of cosmetology; 8    or (iii) completed the barber teacher training as 9    specified in subsection (d) of Section 2-4 of this Act and 10    completed a supplemental cosmetology course as established 11    by rule;12        (5) has passed an examination authorized by the 13    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 14    as a cosmetology teacher or barber teacher; and15        (6) has met any other requirements of this Act and 16    rules.17    An individual who receives a license as a cosmetology 18teacher shall not be required to maintain an active 19cosmetology license in order to practice cosmetology as 20defined in this Act.21    (b) A person is qualified to receive a license as a 22cosmetology clinic teacher if he or she has applied in writing 23or electronically on forms provided by the Department, has 24paid the required fees, and:25        (1) is at least 18 years of age;26        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent;  HB5581- 11 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1        (3) has a current license as a cosmetologist;2        (4) has (i) completed a program of 200 250 hours of 3    clinic teacher training in a licensed school of 4    cosmetology or (ii) within 5 years preceding the 5    examination, has obtained a minimum of 2 years of 6    practical experience working at least 30 full-time hours 7    per week as a licensed cosmetologist and has completed an 8    instructor's institute of 16 20 hours, as prescribed by 9    the Department, prior to submitting an application for 10    examination;11        (5) has passed an examination authorized by the 12    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 13    as a cosmetology teacher; and14        (6) has met any other requirements of this Act and 15    rules.16    The Department shall not issue any new cosmetology clinic 17teacher licenses after January 1, 2009. Any person issued a 18license as a cosmetology clinic teacher before January 1, 192009, may renew the license after that date under this Act and 20that person may continue to renew the license or have the 21license restored during the person's lifetime, subject only to 22the renewal or restoration requirements for the license under 23this Act; however, such licensee and license shall remain 24subject to the provisions of this Act, including, but not 25limited to, provisions concerning renewal, restoration, fees, 26continuing education, discipline, administration, and   HB5581- 12 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1enforcement. 2(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 3    (225 ILCS 410/3-6)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703-6)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)5    Sec. 3-6. Examination. The Department shall authorize 6examinations of applicants for licensure as cosmetologists and 7teachers of cosmetology at the times and places it may 8determine. Upon request, the examinations shall be 9administered in Spanish and any other language as may be 10determined by the Department to be necessary pursuant to the 11Language Equity and Access Act. The Department may provide by 12rule for the administration of the examination prior to the 13completion of the applicant's program of training as required 14in Section 3-2, 3-3, or 3-4. Notwithstanding Section 3-2, 3-3, 15or 3-4, an applicant for licensure as a cosmetologist who has 16completed 960 1,200 hours in the study of cosmetology may take 17the examination. If an applicant for licensure as a 18cosmetologist fails to pass 3 examinations conducted by the 19Department, the applicant shall, before taking a subsequent 20examination, furnish evidence of not less than 100 hours of 21additional study of cosmetology in a licensed school of 22cosmetology since the applicant last took the examination. If 23an applicant for licensure as a cosmetology teacher fails to 24pass 3 examinations conducted by the Department, the applicant 25shall, before taking a subsequent examination, furnish   HB5581- 13 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1evidence of not less than 64 80 hours of additional study in 2teaching methodology and educational psychology in a licensed 3school of cosmetology since the applicant last took the 4examination. The requirements for remedial training set forth 5in this Section may be waived in whole or in part by the 6Department upon proof to the Department that the applicant has 7demonstrated competence to again sit for the examination or if 8the Department otherwise determines a waiver is appropriate. 9The Department shall adopt rules establishing the standards by 10which this determination shall be made. Each cosmetology 11applicant shall be given an examination testing both 12theoretical and practical knowledge, which shall include, but 13not be limited to, questions that determine the applicant's 14knowledge of product chemistry, sanitary rules, sanitary 15procedures, chemical service procedures, hazardous chemicals 16and exposure minimization, knowledge of the anatomy of the 17skin, scalp, hair, and nails as they relate to applicable 18services under this Act and labor and compensation laws.19    The examination of applicants for licensure as a 20cosmetology, esthetics, or nail technology teacher may include 21all of the elements of the exam for licensure as a 22cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician and also 23include teaching methodology, classroom management, record 24keeping, and any other related subjects that the Department in 25its discretion may deem necessary to ensure competent 26performance.  HB5581- 14 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 2    (225 ILCS 410/3-9)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)4    Sec. 3-9. Licensed barber seeking license as 5cosmetologist. A licensed barber who submits to the Department 6an application for licensure as a cosmetologist must meet all 7requirements of this Act for licensure as a cosmetologist, 8except that such applicant shall be given credit for hours of 9instruction completed for the applicant's barber license in 10subjects that are common to both barbering and cosmetology and 11shall complete an additional 400 500 hours of instruction in 12subjects not within the scope of practice of a barber. The 13Department shall provide for the implementation of this 14provision by rule.15(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 16    (225 ILCS 410/3A-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-2)17    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)18    Sec. 3A-2. Licensure as an esthetician; qualifications. A 19person is qualified to receive a license as a licensed 20esthetician if that person has applied in writing or 21electronically on forms provided by the Department, paid any 22required fees, and:23    a. Is at least 16 years of age; and24    b. Has a certificate of graduation from a school providing   HB5581- 15 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1secondary education, or the recognized equivalent of such a 2certificate, or a person who is beyond the age of compulsory 3school attendance; and4    c. Has graduated from a school of cosmetology or esthetics 5licensed by the Department, having completed a program of 600 6750 hours in the study of esthetics extending over a period of 7not less than 18 weeks. Time spent in such study under the laws 8of another state or territory of the United States or of a 9foreign country or province shall be credited toward the 10period of study required by the provisions of this paragraph; 11and12    d. Has passed an examination authorized by the Department 13to determine fitness to receive a license as a licensed 14esthetician; and15    e. Has met any other requirements of this Act and rules.16(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 17    (225 ILCS 410/3A-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-3)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)19    Sec. 3A-3. Licensure as an esthetics teacher; 20qualifications. 21    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as an 22esthetics teacher if that person has applied in writing or 23electronically on forms supplied by the Department, paid the 24required fees, and:25        (1) is at least 18 years of age;  HB5581- 16 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent;2        (3) has a current license as a licensed cosmetologist 3    or esthetician;4        (4) has either: (i) completed a program of 400 500 5    hours of teacher training in a licensed school of 6    cosmetology or a licensed esthetics school and had 2 years 7    of practical experience as a licensed cosmetologist or 8    esthetician within 5 years preceding the examination; or 9    (ii) completed a program of 600 750 hours of teacher 10    training in a licensed school of cosmetology approved by 11    the Department to teach esthetics or a licensed esthetics 12    school;13        (5) has passed an examination authorized by the 14    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 15    as a licensed cosmetology or esthetics teacher; 16        (6) (blank); and17        (7) has met any other requirements as required by this 18    Act and any rules.19    (b) (Blank).20    (c) An applicant who is issued a license as an esthetics 21teacher is not required to maintain an esthetics license in 22order to practice as an esthetician as defined in this Act.23(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (225 ILCS 410/3A-5)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703A-5)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)  HB5581- 17 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    Sec. 3A-5. Examination. 2    (a) The Department shall authorize examinations of 3applicants for a license as an esthetician or teacher of 4esthetics at such times and places as it may determine. Upon 5request, the examinations shall be administered in Spanish and 6any other language as may be determined by the Department to be 7necessary pursuant to the Language Equity and Access Act. The 8Department shall authorize no fewer than 4 examinations for a 9license as an esthetician or a teacher of esthetics in a 10calendar year. An applicant for licensure as an esthetician 11who has completed 480 600 hours in the study of esthetics may 12take the examination. 13    If an applicant neglects, fails without an approved 14excuse, or refuses to take the next available examination 15offered for licensure under this Act, the fee paid by the 16applicant shall be forfeited to the Department and the 17application denied. If an applicant fails to pass an 18examination for licensure under this Act within 3 years after 19filing his or her application, the application shall be 20denied. However, such applicant may thereafter make a new 21application for examination, accompanied by the required fee, 22if he or she meets the requirements in effect at the time of 23reapplication. If an applicant for licensure as an esthetician 24is unsuccessful at 3 examinations conducted by the Department, 25the applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 26furnish evidence of not less than 40 50 hours of additional   HB5581- 18 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1study of esthetics in a licensed school of cosmetology or 2esthetics since the applicant last took the examination. If an 3applicant for licensure as an esthetics teacher is 4unsuccessful at 3 examinations conducted by the Department, 5the applicant shall, before taking a subsequent examination, 6furnish evidence of not less than 40 50 hours of additional 7study in teaching methodology and educational psychology in a 8licensed school of cosmetology or esthetics since the 9applicant last took the examination. The requirements for 10remedial training set forth in this Section may be waived in 11whole or in part by the Department upon proof to the Department 12that the applicant has demonstrated competence to again sit 13for the examination or if the Department otherwise determines 14a waiver is appropriate. The Department shall adopt rules 15establishing the standards by which this determination shall 16be made.17    (b) Each applicant shall be given a written examination 18testing both theoretical and practical knowledge which shall 19include, but not be limited to, questions that determine the 20applicant's knowledge, as provided by rule.21    (c) The examination of applicants for licensure as an 22esthetics teacher may include:23        (1) teaching methodology;24        (2) classroom management; and25        (3) record keeping and any other subjects that the 26    Department may deem necessary to ensure competent   HB5581- 19 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    performance.2    (d) (Blank).3(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 4    (225 ILCS 410/3C-2)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-2)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)6    Sec. 3C-2. License; qualifications. A person is qualified 7to receive a license as a nail technician if that person 8applies in writing or electronically on forms provided by the 9Department, pays the required fee, and:10        (a) Is at least 16 years of age;11        (b) Is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance 12    or has a certificate of graduation from a school providing 13    secondary education or the recognized equivalent of that 14    certificate;15        (c) Has graduated from a licensed school of 16    cosmetology or school of nail technology, having completed 17    a program of 280 350 hours in the study of nail technology 18    extending over a period of not less than 8 weeks; 19        (d) Has passed an examination authorized by the 20    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 21    as a nail technician; and22        (e) Has met any other requirements of this Act or any 23    applicable rules.24    Time spent in the study of nail technology under the laws 25of another state or territory of the United States, or of a   HB5581- 20 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1foreign country or province, shall be credited toward the 2period of study required by the provisions of subsection (c).3(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 4    (225 ILCS 410/3C-3)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-3)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)6    Sec. 3C-3. Licensure as a nail technology teacher; 7qualifications.8    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as a nail 9technology teacher if that person has filed an application on 10forms provided by the Department, paid the required fee, and:11        (1) is at least 18 years of age;12        (2) has graduated from high school or its equivalent;13        (3) has a current license as a cosmetologist or nail 14    technician;15        (4) has either: (1) completed a program of 400 500 16    hours of teacher training in a licensed school of nail 17    technology or cosmetology, and had 2 years of practical 18    experience as a nail technician; or (2) has completed a 19    program of 600 625 hours of teacher training in a licensed 20    school of cosmetology approved to teach nail technology or 21    school of nail technology;22        (5) who has passed an examination authorized by the 23    Department to determine eligibility to receive a license 24    as a cosmetology or nail technology teacher; and25        (6) has met any other requirements of this Act and any   HB5581- 21 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    applicable rules. 2    (b) An applicant who receives a license as a nail 3technology teacher shall not be required to maintain a license 4as a nail technician.5(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 6    (225 ILCS 410/3C-7)  (from Ch. 111, par. 1703C-7)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)8    Sec. 3C-7. Examinations; failure or refusal to take 9examination. The Department shall authorize examinations of 10applicants for licenses as nail technicians and teachers of 11nail technology at the times and places as it may determine. 12Upon request, the examinations shall be administered in 13Spanish and any other language as may be determined by the 14Department to be necessary pursuant to the Language Equity and 15Access Act. An applicant for licensure as a nail technician 16who has completed 224 280 hours in the study of nail technology 17may take the examination. 18    The Department shall authorize not less than 4 19examinations for licenses as nail technicians, and nail 20technology teachers in a calendar year.21    If an applicant neglects, fails without an approved 22excuse, or refuses to take the next available examination 23offered for licensure under this Act, the fee paid by the 24applicant shall be forfeited to the Department and the 25application denied. If an applicant fails to pass an   HB5581- 22 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1examination for licensure under this Act within 3 years after 2filing an application, the application shall be denied. 3Nevertheless, the applicant may thereafter make a new 4application for examination, accompanied by the required fee, 5if he or she meets the requirements in effect at the time of 6reapplication. If an applicant for licensure as a nail 7technician or nail technology teacher is unsuccessful at 3 8examinations conducted by the Department, the applicant shall, 9before taking a subsequent examination, furnish evidence of 10successfully completing (i) for a nail technician, not less 11than 24 hours of additional study of nail technology in a 12licensed school of cosmetology approved to teach nail 13technology or nail technology and (ii) for a nail technology 14teacher, not less than 64 80 hours of additional study in 15teaching methodology and educational psychology in a licensed 16school of cosmetology or nail technology since the applicant 17last took the examination. The requirements for remedial 18training set forth in this Section may be waived in whole or in 19part by the Department upon proof to the Department that the 20applicant has demonstrated competence to sit for the 21examination again or if the Department otherwise determines a 22waiver is appropriate. The Department shall adopt rules 23establishing the standards by which this determination shall 24be made. 25    Each applicant for licensure as a nail technician shall be 26given an examination testing both theoretical and practical   HB5581- 23 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1knowledge, which shall include, but not be limited to, 2questions that determine the applicant's knowledge of product 3chemistry, sanitary rules, sanitary procedures, hazardous 4chemicals and exposure minimization, this Act, and labor and 5compensation laws.6    The examination for licensure as a nail technology teacher 7may include knowledge of the subject matter, teaching 8methodology, classroom management, record keeping, and any 9other subjects that the Department in its discretion may deem 10necessary to ensure competent performance.11(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 12    (225 ILCS 410/3E-2)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)14    Sec. 3E-2. Hair braider licensure; qualifications.15    (a) A person is qualified to receive a license as a hair 16braider if he or she has filed an application in writing or 17electronically on forms provided by the Department, paid the 18required fees, and meets the following qualifications:19        (1) Is at least 16 years of age;20        (2) Is beyond the age of compulsory school attendance 21    or has received a certificate of graduation from a school 22    providing secondary education, or the recognized 23    equivalent of that certificate;24        (3) Has completed a program consisting of a minimum of 25    240 300 clock hours or an 8 a 10 credit hour equivalency of   HB5581- 24 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1    instruction, as defined by rule, in a licensed cosmetology 2    school teaching a hair braiding curriculum or in a 3    licensed hair braiding school as follows:4            (A) Basic training consisting of 28 35 hours of 5        classroom instruction in general theory, practical 6        application, and technical application in the 7        following subject areas: history of hair braiding, 8        personal hygiene and public health, professional 9        ethics, disinfection and sanitation, bacteriology, 10        disorders and diseases of the hair and scalp, OSHA 11        standards relating to material safety data sheets 12        (MSDS) on chemicals, hair analysis and scalp care, and 13        technical procedures;14            (B) Related concepts consisting of 28 35 hours of 15        classroom instruction in the following subject areas: 16        Braid removal and scalp care; basic styling knowledge; 17        tools and equipment; growth patterns, styles and 18        sectioning; client consultation and face shapes; and 19        client education, pre-care, post-care, home care and 20        follow-up services;21            (C) Practices and procedures consisting of 160 200 22        hours of instruction, which shall be a combination of 23        classroom instruction and clinical practical 24        application, in the following subject areas: single 25        braids with and without extensions; cornrows with and 26        without extensions; twists and knots; multiple   HB5581- 25 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1        strands; hair locking; weaving/sewn-in; other 2        procedures as they relate to hair-braiding; and 3        product knowledge as it relates to hair braiding; and4            (D) Business practices consisting of 24 30 hours 5        of classroom instruction in the following subject 6        areas: Illinois Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair 7        Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985 and Rules; 8        salon management; human relations and salesmanship; 9        and Workers' Compensation Act; and10        (4) Has met any other requirements of this Act and any 11    applicable rules. 12    (b) The expiration date and renewal period for each 13license issued under this Act shall be set by rule. 14    (c) Within 2 years after the effective date of this 15amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the Department 16may issue a hair braider license to any applicant who does not 17meet the requirements of items (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of 18this Section if the applicant: (1) files an application in 19accordance with subsection (a), (2) pays the required fee, (3) 20has not committed an offense that would be grounds for 21discipline under this Act, and (4) is able to demonstrate to 22the Department through tax records or affidavits that he or 23she has practiced hair braiding for at least 2 consecutive 24years immediately prior to the date of his or her application.25    A hair braider who obtains his or her license under this 26subsection (c) may renew his or her license if he or she   HB5581- 26 -LRB104 18522 AAS 31964 b1applies to the Department for renewal and has completed at 2least 52 65 hours of relevant training in health, safety, 3hygiene, and business management in accordance with the 4requirements of this Section or any rule adopted pursuant to 5this Section. A hair braider who renews his or her license 6under this subsection (c) may thereafter only renew his or her 7license if he or she meets the requirements of Section 3E-5 of 8this Act.9(Source: P.A. 104-153, eff. 1-1-26.) 10    (225 ILCS 410/3E-3)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2031)12    Sec. 3E-3. Hair braiding teacher licensure. A hair 13braiding teacher license shall be made available by the 14Department. The qualifications for a hair braiding teacher 15license shall be provided by rule, and shall include at least 16600 clock hours or a 16 20 credit hour equivalency in relevant 17teaching methods and curriculum content, or at least 400 500 18clock hours of hair braiding teacher training for an 19individual who is able to establish that he or she has had at 20least 2 years of practical experience.21(Source: P.A. 96-1246, eff. 1-1-11.)